North Carolina, session 2025, SB101.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PROTECT CERTAIN TAX-ADVANTAGED ACCOUNTS
SECTION 1.(a) Article 16 of Chapter 1C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new section to read:
"§ 1C-1601.5. Certain tax-advantaged accounts exempt.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Qualifying account. – Any of the following:
a. An education savings and investment plan account qualified under
section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
b. An ABLE account qualified under section 529A of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) Qualifying purpose. – Any of the following:
a. For education savings and investment plan accounts, any purpose
permitted under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
b. For ABLE accounts, any purpose permitted under section 529A of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including G.S. 1C-1601(e), funds
located in a qualifying account or withdrawn from the account and used for a qualifying purpose
shall not be subject to liens, attachment, garnishment, levy, seizure, any involuntary sale or
assignment by operation or execution of law, or the enforcement of any other judgment or claim
to pay any debt or liability of any account owner, beneficiary, or contributor to an account.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Prohibit the distribution of funds from an ABLE account following the death
of the account owner under G.S. 147-86.73(e) or section 529A of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) Limit the enforcement of judgments or claims on funds that meet any of the
following criteria:
a. Were not used for a qualifying purpose.
*S101-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Were deposited into a qualifying account as a result of fraud,
intentional wrongdoing, or other violation of law."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 1C-1601(a)(10) is repealed.
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective September 1, 2025, and applies to
actions filed on or after that date.

PART II. LIVE ORGAN DONOR PROTECTIONS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 58-3-25 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) No insurer shall refuse to insure or to continue to insure an individual; limit the
amount, extent, or kind of coverage available to an individual; charge an individual a different
amount for the same coverage; or otherwise discriminate against an individual in the offering,
issuance, cancellation, price, or conditions of a policy, or in the amount of coverage provided
under a policy, based solely and without any additional actuarial risks on the status of an
individual as a living organ donor. This subsection shall apply to health benefit plans and life,
accident and health, disability, disability income, and long-term care insurance policies. For the
purposes of this subsection, the phrase "a living organ donor" shall mean a living individual who
donates one or more of that individual's human organs, including bone marrow, to be medically
transplanted into the body of another individual."
SECTION 2.(b) Article 2 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 126-8.7. Paid leave for State employees and State-supported personnel for organ
donation.
(a) Full-Time Employees. – The State Human Resources Commission shall adopt rules
and policies to provide that a permanent, full-time State employee may take, in addition to any
other leave available to the employee, up to (i) 30 days of paid leave for the purposes of serving
as a living organ donor and (ii) seven days for serving as a bone marrow donor. The employee
must have been continuously employed by the State for at least 12 months immediately preceding
the first request for paid organ or bone marrow donation leave.
(b) Part-Time Employees. – The State Human Resources Commission shall adopt rules
and policies to provide that a permanent, part-time State employee may take, in addition to any
other leave available to the employee, a prorated amount of up to (i) 30 days of paid leave for the
purposes of serving as a living organ donor and (ii) seven days for serving as a bone marrow
donor. The employee must have been continuously employed by the State for at least 12 months
immediately preceding the first request for paid organ or bone marrow donation leave.
(c) Program Requirements. – The paid leave for organ or bone marrow donation
authorized by this section:
(1) Is available without exhaustion of the employee's sick and vacation leave.
(2) Is in addition to, and not in lieu of, shared leave under G.S. 126-8.3, or other
leave authorized by federal or State law.
(3) May not be used for retirement purposes.
(4) Has no cash value upon termination from employment.
(d) Applicability. – This section applies to all (i) State employees and (ii) State-supported
personnel, with the appropriate governing board adopting rules and policies to provide paid leave
for organ donation to its employees as provided by this section.
(e) Reporting. – By April 1, 2026, and then annually thereafter, the State Human
Resources Commission, the State Board of Education, the State Board of Community Colleges,
and all State agencies, departments, and institutions shall annually report to the Office of State
Human Resources on the paid organ donation leave program."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 126-5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c22) The provisions of G.S. 126-8.7 shall apply to all State employees, public school
employees, and community college employees."
Page 2 Senate Bill 101-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(d) Subsection (a) of this section is effective 30 days after it becomes
law and applies to insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date. The
remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 101-Second Edition Page 3